Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.200

Books, records, and contracts.

(1) All entities required to register pursuant to this chapter must maintain accurate, current, and readily available books and records at their usual business locations until at least three years have elapsed following the effective period to which they relate. The books and records must contain, at a minimum, documentation supporting the information contained in the solicitation report and written authorization or authorizations required in RCW 19.09.100.

(2) All contracts between commercial fund-raisers and charitable organizations must be in writing, and true and correct copies of such contracts or records thereof must be kept on file in the various offices of the charitable organization and the commercial fund-raiser for a three-year period. Such records and contracts shall be available for inspection and examination by the secretary of state, attorney general, or by the county prosecuting attorney. A copy of such contract or record must be submitted by the charitable organization or commercial fund-raiser, within ten days, following receipt of a written demand from the secretary of state, attorney general, or county prosecutor.

[ 2011 c 199 s 15; 1993 c 471 s 11; 1986 c 230 s 12; 1982 c 227 s 9; 1973 1st ex.s. c 13 s 20.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1982 c 227: See note following RCW 19.09.100.